District of Columbia statutes.
1-301.46

Enacting and resolving clauses in acts and resolutions; numbering of sections.

(a)

Each act of the Council of the District of Columbia shall have an enacting clause only in the 1st section of each act and such enacting clause shall be in the following form: “Be it enacted by the Council of the District of Columbia,”.

(b)

Each resolution of the Council of the District of Columbia shall have a resolving clause in the following form: “Resolved, by the Council of the District of Columbia,”.

(c)

Each section of each act or resolution shall be numbered consecutively.

History

Sept. 23, 1975, D.C. Law 1-17, § 3, 22 DCR 1991

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-231.
1973 Ed., § 1-146b.